District of Columbia statutes.
17-307

Time for taking or applying for allowance of appeals.

(a)

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, the time during which an appeal may be taken pursuant to section 11-721 or 11-722 may be fixed by rules of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

(b)

Applications for the allowance of appeals from judgments of the Small Claims and Conciliation Branch of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, and from judgments in the criminal division of that court where the penalty imposed is less than $50, specified by section 11-721(c), shall, in each case, be filed in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals within three days from the date of judgment.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 615, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 146(a)(7)
This section is referenced in § 17-301 and § 17-303.
1981 Ed., § 17-307.
1973 Ed., § 17-307.